Hawaii statutes.
[Part iV.] PUBLIC-PRIVATE partnerships for
the delivery of

health care services at MAUI REGIONAL SYSTEM
FACILITIES

Note

Governor to inform the president of the senate and the
speaker of the house of representatives of transfer completion dates. L 2015,
c 103, §4.

Cross References

Separation benefits for Hawaii health systems corporation
employees, see chapter 89E.

[§323F-51] Definitions. As used in
this part:

"Nonprofit management entity" means a
nonprofit organization duly authorized to transact business in the State, the
sole shareholder or member of which is the private entity, whose principal
purpose is to manage and operate a medical care facility.

"Pre-transfer facility" means a
facility of the Maui regional system prior to its transformation into a
transferred facility.

"Private entity" means a business
organization duly authorized to transact business in the State that:

(1) Has a certificate of need to operate one or more
licensed hospitals in the State obtained from the state health planning and
development agency pursuant to part V of chapter 323D; or

(2) Is the sole member of a nonprofit management
entity or hospital that has a certificate of need to operate one or more
licensed hospitals in the State obtained from the state health planning and
development agency pursuant to part V of chapter 323D.

"Transfer completion date" means the
date specified as the transfer completion date in an agreement entered into
pursuant to section 323F-52, including any extensions allowed under the terms
of such agreement.

"Transferred facility" means a
medical facility of the Maui regional system for which the right and
responsibility to manage, operate, and otherwise provide health care services
at the facility is transferred to a private entity or its nonprofit management
entity pursuant to this part. [L 2015, c 103, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next